Utah statutes.
78A-6-106.   Search warrants and subpoenas -- Authority to issue --
Protective custody -- Expedited hearing.
(1)  The court has authority to issue search warrants, subpoenas, or
investigative subpoenas in criminal cases, delinquency, and abuse, neglect,
and dependency proceedings for the same purposes, in the same manner and
pursuant to the same procedures set forth in the code of criminal procedure
for the issuance of search warrants, subpoenas, or investigative subpoenas in
other trial courts in the state.
(2)  A peace officer or child welfare worker may not enter the home of a child
who is not under the jurisdiction of the court, remove a child from the
child's home or school, or take a child into protective custody unless:
(a)  there exist exigent circumstances sufficient to relieve the peace officer
or child welfare worker of the requirement to obtain a warrant;
(b)  the peace officer or child welfare worker obtains a search warrant under
Subsection (3);
(c)  the peace officer or child welfare worker obtains a court order after the
parent or guardian of the child is given notice and an opportunity to be
heard; or
(d)  the peace officer or child welfare worker obtains the consent of the
child's parent or guardian.
(3) (a)  The court may issue a warrant authorizing a child protective services
worker or peace officer to search for a child and take the child into
protective custody if it appears to the court upon a verified petition,
recorded sworn testimony or an affidavit sworn to by a peace officer or any
other person, and upon the examination of other witnesses, if required by the
judge, that there is probable cause to believe that:
(i)  there is a threat of substantial harm to the child's health or safety;
(ii)  it is necessary to take the child into protective custody to avoid the
harm described in Subsection (3)(a)(i); and
(iii)  it is likely that the child will suffer substantial harm if the parent
or guardian of the child is given notice and an opportunity to be heard before
the child is taken into protective custody.
(b)  Pursuant to Section 77-23-210, a peace officer making the search may
enter a house or premises by force, if necessary, in order to remove the
child.
(c)  The person executing the warrant shall then take the child to the place
of shelter designated by the court or the division.
(4) (a)  Consistent with Subsection (5), the court shall hold an expedited
hearing to determine whether a child should be placed in protective custody
if:
(i)  a person files a petition under Section 78A-6-304;
(ii)  a party to the proceeding files a "Motion for Expedited Placement in
Temporary Custody"; and
(iii)  notice of the hearing described in this Subsection (4)(a) is served
consistent with the requirements for notice of a shelter hearing under Section
78A-6-306.
(b)  The hearing described in Subsection (4)(a):
(i)  shall be held within 72 hours, excluding weekends and holidays, of the
filing of the motion described in Subsection (4)(a)(ii); and
(ii)  shall be considered a shelter hearing under Section 78A-6-306 and Utah
Rules of Juvenile Procedure, Rule 13.
(5) (a)  The hearing and notice described in Subsection (4) are subject to:
(i)  Section 78A-6-306;
(ii)  Section 78A-6-307; and
(iii)  the Utah Rules of Juvenile Procedure.
(b)  After the hearing described in Subsection (4), a court may order a child
placed in the temporary custody of the division.
(6)  When notice to a parent or guardian is required by this section:
(a)  the parent or guardian to be notified must be:
(i)  the child's primary caregiver; or
(ii)  the parent or guardian who has custody of the child, when the order is
sought; and
(b)  the person required to provide notice shall make a good faith effort to
provide notice to a parent or guardian who:
(i)  is not required to be notified under Subsection (6)(a); and
(ii)  has the right to parent-time with the child.
